Georgia statutes. TITLE 6 Aviation
Article 2 Powers of Local Governments as to Air Facilities

6-3-20.
Acquisition, construction, maintenance, and control of airports and landing fields by local governments authorized.

Counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions are authorized, separately or jointly, to acquire, establish, construct, expand, own, lease, control, equip, improve, maintain, operate, regulate, and police airports and landing fields for the use of aircraft, either within or without the geographical limits of such counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, and may use for such purpose or purposes any available property that is owned or controlled by such counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions. Counties and municipalities may enter into cooperative agreements with community improvement districts for the improvement of airports and landing fields within such community improvement districts, and community improvement districts may enter into such cooperative agreements with counties and municipalities for such purposes, in accordance with Article IX, Section VII of the Constitution.

All counties in the State of Georgia which are located on the boundary line between the State of Georgia and any other state, as well as all municipalities and other political subdivisions which are located in such boundary counties, are authorized, separately, jointly with each other, or jointly with any county, municipality, or political subdivision of any such border state, to acquire, establish, construct, expand, own, lease, control, equip, improve, maintain, operate, regulate, and police airports and landing fields for the use of aircraft, either within or without the geographical limits of such border counties and the municipalities and other political subdivisions therein contained in the State of Georgia or within the geographical limits of any county, municipality, or political subdivision of any such border state other than the State of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 1; Code 1933, § 11-201; Ga. L. 1941, p. 380, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1342, § 1/SB 371.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the last sentence in subsection (a).

Cross references.

Regulation and taxation of sale and storage of alcoholic beverages at county and municipal airports, §

3-8-1

.

Sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine by airline passenger carriers, §§

3-9-1

,

3-9-2

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Howard v. City of Atlanta,

190 Ga. 730

,

10 S.E.2d 190

(1940), see 3 Ga. B.J. 57 (1940).

For article discussing extraterritorial condemnation of property by municipalities, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1977).

6-3-20.1.
Management, ownership, or control of airports by foreign citizens or businesses with substantial foreign ownership prohibited.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Airport” means the real and personal property constituting an airport as a complete entity or unit, and the management, operation, or control of an airport means the overall management, operation, or control of the airport as a complete entity or unit.

“Business entity with a substantial foreign ownership” means any business entity in which 25 percent or more of the equity in such business entity is owned by persons or other business entities that are not citizens of the United States.

“Citizen of the United States” means any individual person who is a citizen of the United States and any business entity incorporated or having its principal place of business in the United States, but the term shall not include any business entity with a substantial foreign ownership.

“Person” means an individual person.

No county, municipality, or other political subdivision and no public authority owning or controlling an airport shall sell, lease, or otherwise contract with any person or business entity which is not a citizen of the United States or with any business entity with a substantial foreign ownership to have such person or business entity manage, operate, own, or control such airport.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not prevent or be construed to prevent any person who is not a citizen of the United States or any business entity with a substantial foreign ownership from leasing or purchasing portions of any airport for the purpose of conducting such person’s or entity’s lawful business thereon or from leasing or subleasing portions of any airport for the purpose of allowing any other such person or entity to conduct its lawful business thereon.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-3-20.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1845, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to §

28-9-5

, in 1988, the comma was deleted following “entity’s lawful business thereon” near the end of subsection (c).

6-3-21.
Lands acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied by local governments deemed for public purposes; effect on ad valorem taxation.

Any lands acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied by counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions for the purpose or purposes enumerated in Code Section 6-3-20 shall be and are declared to be acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied for public, governmental, and municipal purposes; provided, however, that with respect to facilities located on such lands, which lands are located outside of the territorial limits of the political subdivision that leases such lands and which are leased to, controlled, or occupied by private parties, the interests created in such private parties, for the purpose of ad valorem taxation only, are declared not to be used for public, governmental, or municipal purposes and said resulting interests, so long as the interests create an estate in land, are subject to ad valorem taxation; provided, further, that the underlying fee interest in such property which remains vested in the county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall be deemed to be used for public, governmental, and municipal purposes. The municipality’s interest in lands and the facilities located thereon located inside the territorial limits of a municipality which are owned by that municipality for the purposes enumerated in Code Section 6-3-20, are declared to be used for public, governmental, or municipal purposes and are not subject to ad valorem taxation.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 2; Code 1933, § 11-202; Ga. L. 1983, p. 647, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1649, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 824, § 1/HB 399.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, substituted “so long as the interests create an estate in land” for “regardless of the extent of such interest, whether possessory or an estate in land” near the end of the first sentence.

6-3-22.
Methods of acquisition of property for airports and landing fields.

Private property needed by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision for an airport or landing field or for the expansion of an airport or landing field may be acquired by grant, purchase, lease, or other means, if such county, municipality, or other political subdivision is able to agree with the owners of the property on the terms of such acquisition, and otherwise by condemnation in the manner provided by the law under which the county, municipality, or other political subdivision is authorized to acquire real property for public purposes; provided, however, that the power of condemnation may be exercised extraterritorially only with the consent of the governing authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision wherein the property is located, as expressed either in a resolution adopted by such governing authority, granting its consent to such condemnation, or by failure of such governing authority to adopt a resolution denying its consent to such condemnation within 60 days from the receipt of a resolution from the proposed condemnor requesting approval of such condemnation, or with the consent of the General Assembly, as expressed in a resolution enacted by the General Assembly, after denial of consent to such condemnation by the governing authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision wherein the property is located; provided, however, that for any proposed airport or airport expansion by a city into a county where such city is located, or by a county into a city located in such county, the decision of the governing body of the jurisdiction into which such proposed airport or airport expansion is to be located shall be final as to whether or not such power of condemnation may be exercised extraterritorially.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 3; Code 1933, § 11-203; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1434, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note discussing the relation of airport zoning to the constitutional provision requiring just compensation for a taking of property, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 218 (1975).

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 149 (1992).

6-3-22.1.
[Repealed] Acquisition of property outside territorial boundaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-3-22.1

[repealed], enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 953, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 953, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

6-3-23.
Payment of costs of acquisition of property for airports or landing fields.

Costs of acquisition of real property, in accordance with this article, for an airport or landing field may be paid for by appropriation of moneys available therefor or wholly or partly from the proceeds of the sale of bonds of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision, as the legislative body of such political subdivision shall determine; subject however, to the adoption of a proposition therefor at a regular or special election, if the adoption of such a proposition is a prerequisite to the issuance of bonds of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision for public purposes generally.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 4; Code 1933, § 11-204.

6-3-24.
Appropriation of funds for development, operation, maintenance, or control of air facilities.

The local public authorities having power to appropriate moneys within the counties, municipalities, or other public subdivisions acquiring, establishing, developing, operating, maintaining, or controlling airports or landing fields under this article are authorized to appropriate and cause to be raised, by taxation or otherwise, in such counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions, moneys sufficient to carry out therein the provisions of this article and to use for such purpose or purposes moneys derived from said airports or landing fields.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 6; Code 1933, § 11-206.

6-3-25.
Powers and duties of counties, municipalities, and political subdivisions as to airports generally.

Counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions which establish airports or landing fields or which acquire, lease, or set apart real property for such purpose or purposes are authorized to:

Construct, equip, improve, maintain, and operate the same or vest authority for the construction, equipment, improvement, maintenance, and operation thereof in an officer, board, or body of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision. The expense of such construction, equipment, improvement, maintenance, and operation shall be a responsibility of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision;

Adopt regulations and establish charges, fees, and tolls for the use of such airports or landing fields, fix penalties for the violation of said regulations, and establish liens to enforce payment of said charges, fees, and tolls, subject to existing contracts;

Lease such airports or landing fields to private parties for operation or lease or assign to private parties for operation, space, area, improvements, and equipment on such airports or landing fields, provided in each case that in so doing the public is not deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use thereof; and

Lease portions of such property lying within any county having a population of 550,000 or more persons according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census for an initial term of up to 50 years, and to extend such leases, to private parties for development of such property for hotels and related facilities, conference centers, office buildings, commercial and retail uses, and other similar airport and travel related purposes, provided that:

A lease under this paragraph shall expressly grant and convey to the lessee a taxable estate for years in both the property and any improvements upon such property as may be constructed and shall not grant or convey a nontaxable usufruct in either the property or the improvements upon such property; and

The leasing authority granted under this paragraph shall not extend to property acquired for airport noise mitigation purposes pursuant to the former Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970 (49 U.S.C. Section 1701, et seq.), as amended, or the Airport and Airway Improvement Act of 1982 (49 U.S.C. Section 2201, et seq.), as amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 5; Code 1933, § 11-205; Ga. L. 1987, p. 631, § 1.

6-3-26.
Acquisition of rights and easements for radios, lights, markers, and other equipment associated with airport.

Counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions are authorized to acquire the right or easement for a term of years, or perpetually, to place and maintain radio and other equipment, and suitable marks for the daytime, and to place, operate, and maintain suitable lights for the nighttime marking of buildings, or other structures or obstructions, for the safe operation of aircraft utilizing airports and landing fields acquired or maintained under this article. Such rights or easements may be acquired by grant, purchase, lease, or condemnation in the same manner as is provided in Code Section 6-3-22 for the acquisition of the airport or landing field itself or the expansion thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 7; Code 1933, § 11-207.

6-3-27.
Enforcement of police regulations at airports; powers of law enforcement officers.

Counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions acquiring, establishing, developing, operating, maintaining, or controlling airports or landing fields under this article outside the geographical limits of such subdivisions are specifically granted the right to enforce police regulations on such airports or landing fields.

A law enforcement officer of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision operating an airport or landing field outside the geographical limits of such political subdivision shall, when authorized by the county, municipality, or other political subdivision operating said airport or landing field, have the same law enforcement powers, including the powers of arrest, within such airport or landing field and on any public property within one-quarter mile of such airport or landing field as a law enforcement officer of the political subdivision in which such airport or landing field is located.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting the authority of any law enforcement agency of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision in which such airport or landing field is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 8; Code 1933, § 11-208; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1094, § 2.

Cross references.

Regulation and taxation of sale and storage of alcoholic beverages at county and municipal airports, §

3-8-1

.

Sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine by airline passenger carriers, §§

3-9-1

,

3-9-2

.

Transportation passenger safety, §

16-12-121

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 1094, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Security Act of 2002.’ ”

6-3-28.
Construction of article.

It is the intent and purpose of this article that all provisions relating to the issuance of bonds and the levying of taxes for airport purposes and the condemnation for airports and airport facilities shall be construed in accordance with general provisions of the law governing the right and procedure of municipalities to condemn, issue bonds, levy taxes, etc.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 102, § 9; Code 1933, § 11-209.